North Dakota, session 69, SB2041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 43-58-08.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
43-58-08.1. Endorsement for prescribing authority.
1. A naturopath may not prescribe, dispense, or administer a prescription medication
without first obtaining an endorsement for licensure.
2. The naturopath first must apply for a limited endorsement with the board in which the
naturopath enters a written collaborative agreement with a supervising physician
licensed under chapter 43-17, who will review the first one hundred prescriptions
issued by the naturopath or twelve months of prescribing, whichever occurs first. The
supervising physician shall possess an unencumbered license and have been
prescribing and administering prescription drugs without limitation for at least five
years in the state. The supervising physician shall evaluate the naturopath's ability to
safely prescribe and administer prescription drugs within the naturopath's scope of
practice and to comply with federal and state laws. The written collaborative
agreement must address the requirements of this subsection and be provided to the
board along with the application for endorsement. The board, by rule, further shall
define the terms of the supervising physician's role in reviewing the naturopath's
prescribing practices.
3. A naturopath who satisfies the requirements of subsection 2 shall notify the board in
writing with verification from the supervising physician that this requirement has been
Page No. 1 25.8002.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
met. Upon verification subsection 2 has been met, and the naturopath successfully
completed the pharmacology elective examination approved by the board, the board
shall issue the naturopath an endorsement to prescribe independently.The board shall
issue the naturopath an endorsement to prescribe independently upon verification that
subsection 2 has been met and the naturopath provides satisfactory proof of one o f
the following options within one year from completion of subsection 2 unless otherwise
approved by the board for good cause shown:
a. Completion of the pharmacology elective examination approved by the board;
b. Completion of twelve months of clinical experience in naturopathic medicine in a
residency program recognized by the board and associated with an accredited
school or college of naturopathic medicine, and under the preceptorship of a
licensed naturopathic doctor or physician; or
c. Substantial experience in prescribing prescription medications for three years
without discipline in another jurisdiction as verified by a physician or facility.
4. The board may waive the requirements of subsection 2 and examination under
subsection 3 subsections 2 and 3 if a naturopath shows the naturopath has substantial
experience in prescribing prescription medications under the laws of another
jurisdiction that has standards and qualifications for a naturopath to prescribe
prescription medications at least equal to those required under this chapter.
5. To maintain the endorsements provided under this section, the naturopath shall obtain
five hours of continuing education hours annually regarding pharmacology of
testosterone and legend drugs.
Page No. 2 25.8002.01000